New York, session 2025-2026, A2726.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 2999-gg of the public health law, 2 as added by section 1 of part N of chapter 56 of the laws of 2017, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. In order for an authorized agency that is approved by the office of 5 children and family services to care for or board out children, to 6 provide limited health-related services as defined in regulations of the 7 department either directly or indirectly through a contract arrangement, 8 such agency shall obtain, in accordance with a schedule developed by the 9 department in conjunction with the office of children and family 10 services, a license issued by the commissioner in conjunction with the 11 office of children and family services to provide such services. Such 12 schedule shall require that all such authorized agencies operating on 13 January first, two thousand nineteen obtain the license required by this 14 section no later than January first, two thousand nineteen. Such 15 licenses shall be issued in accordance with the standards set forth in 16 this article and the regulations of the department which shall, at a 17 minimum, specify: 18 (a) mandated health services, which shall include, but not be limited 19 to, nursing and behavioral health services; general physical environment 20 requirements; minimum health and safety procedures; record management 21 requirements; quality management activities; and managed care liaison, 22 fiscal and billing activities; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00839-02-5 A. 2726--A 2 1 (b) to whom services may be provided, which shall include, but is not 2 limited to children and youth in foster care, and their families, which 3 for the purposes of this section shall include both the birth family and 4 the foster family; other families receiving child welfare services from 5 the authorized agency or the local departments of social services; and 6 students with disabilities placed by a committee on special education 7 pursuant to article eighty-nine of the education law. In determining 8 the criteria for licensure, regulations shall take into account the size 9 and type of each program, and shall be reasonably related to the 10 provision of medical services. Provided however, that a license pursuant 11 to this section shall not be required if such authorized agency is 12 otherwise authorized to provide the required limited-health-related 13 services to foster children under a license issued pursuant to article 14 twenty-eight of this chapter or article thirty-one of the mental hygiene 15 law. For the purposes of this section, the term authorized agency shall 16 be an authorized agency as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision ten 17 of section three hundred seventy-one of the social services law. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect six months after it shall have become 19 a law.